Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.240

Architects' license account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5294-S.SL) ***

There is established in the state treasury the architects' license account, into which all fees paid pursuant to this chapter shall be paid, except as provided in RCW 18.08.510.

[ 2018 c 207 s 9; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 2; 1985 c 57 s 4; 1959 c 323 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 207 ss 9 and 10: See note following RCW 18.08.510.

Effective dates—1991 sp.s. c 13: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions.

(1) On or before June 30, 1991, the balances remaining in the local jail improvement and construction account, the 1979 handicapped facilities construction account, the salmon enhancement construction account, the community college capital improvements accounts, and the fisheries capital projects account shall be transferred to the state building construction account and the balance remaining in the Washington State University construction account shall be transferred to the Washington State University building account.

(2) Except for subsection (1) of this section, sections 1 through 47, 49 through 64, 66 through 108, and 110 through 122 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1991, but shall not be effective for earnings on balances prior to July 1, 1991, regardless of when a distribution is made.

(3) Sections 48 and 109 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1991.

(4) Section 65 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1992.

(5) *Sections 123 through 139 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1993, and shall be effective for earnings on balances beginning July 1, 1993, regardless of when a distribution is made." [ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 141.]

*Reviser's note: "Sections 123 through 139 of this act" [1991 sp.s. c 13] were vetoed by the governor.

Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 140.]

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.